Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1063.
do enact as follows:SB1063,11Section 1. 704.052 of the statutes is created to read:SB1063,3,22704.052 Application fees prohibited. (1) In this section, “application fee” 3means any charge or fee imposed by a landlord on a prospective tenant for the 4landlord’s review and consideration of an application for tenancy under a rental 1agreement. “Application fee” does not include a credit check or background check 2fee authorized under s. 704.085.SB1063,3,53(2) A landlord may not charge a prospective tenant an application fee or 4accept earnest money from a prospective tenant any portion of which includes an 5application fee.SB1063,26Section 2. 704.085 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1063,3,177704.085 (1) (a) Except as provided under par. (b), a landlord may require a 8prospective tenant to pay the landlord’s actual cost, up to $25, to obtain a consumer 9credit report on the prospective tenant from a consumer credit reporting agency 10that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis. The 11landlord shall notify the prospective tenant of the proposed charge, and provide the 12prospective tenant a reasonable opportunity to provide a consumer credit report 13under par. (b), before requesting the consumer credit report, and. If a landlord 14charges a tenant for a consumer credit report under this paragraph, the landlord 15shall provide the prospective tenant with a copy of the report, in digital or print 16format or both as requested by the prospective tenant, within 7 business days after 17the date the landlord receives the consumer credit report.SB1063,3,2218(b) A landlord may not require a prospective tenant to pay for a consumer 19credit report under par. (a) if, before the landlord requests a consumer credit report, 20the prospective tenant provides the landlord with a consumer credit report, from a 21consumer credit reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers 22on a nationwide basis, that is less than 30 days 6 months old.SB1063,323Section 3. 704.085 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 704.085 (2) (a) and 24amended to read:SB1063,4,101704.085 (2) (a) A Except as provided in par. (b), a landlord may require a 2prospective tenant who is not a resident of this state to pay the landlord’s actual 3cost, up to $25, to obtain a background check on the prospective tenant. The 4landlord shall notify the prospective tenant of the proposed charge, and provide the 5prospective tenant a reasonable opportunity to provide a background check report 6under par. (b), before requesting the background check and. If a landlord charges a 7tenant for a background check report under this paragraph, the landlord shall 8provide the prospective tenant with a copy of the report, in digital or print format or 9both as requested by the prospective tenant, within 7 business days after the date 10the landlord receives the background check report.SB1063,411Section 4. 704.085 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1063,4,1512704.085 (2) (b) A landlord may not require a prospective tenant to pay for a 13background check under par. (a) if, before the landlord requests a background 14check, the prospective tenant provides the landlord with a background check report 15received from any landlord that is less than 6 months old.SB1063,516Section 5. Initial applicability.SB1063,4,1817(1) This act first applies to rental applications submitted on the effective date 18of this subsection.SB1063,619Section 6. Effective date.SB1063,4,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 21publication.SB1063,4,2222